Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-813
Statute of limitations.

An action may not be brought under section 45-810 or 45-812 after four years after the date of the execution of the contract for services to which the action relates.

Laws 1991, LB 292, § 13.